Utah statutes.
63G-12-212.   Sharing of information related to enforcement.

(1)  The department shall provide the notice described in Subsection (2), if the department determines that an undocumented individual:

(a)  has the undocumented individual's permit revoked; or

(b)  permits the undocumented individual's permit to expire and the department has reason to believe that the undocumented individual continues to reside in the state.

(2) (a)  The department shall provide the notice required by Subsection (1) to:

(i)  Utah's attorney general; and

(ii)  United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement.

(b)  The notice described in Subsection (2)(a) shall:

(i)  include:

(A)  the last known address of the undocumented individual; and

(B)  the basis of the notice described in Subsection (1); and

(ii)  be sent promptly after the day on which the time to appeal, if any, the action that is the basis for the notification under Subsection (1) ends.

